Virginia statutes. Title 23.1. Institutions of Higher Education; Other Educational and Cultural Institutions.
Article 4. Virginia Water Resources Research Center.

§ 23.1-2628.
Virginia Water Resources Research Center established.

The Virginia Water Resources Research Center (the Water Center) is established to develop, implement, and coordinate water and related land research programs in the Commonwealth and transfer the results of research and new technology to potential users. The Water Center shall be located at the University.

History.

1982, c. 379, § 23-135.7:8; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-2629.
Control and supervision.

The Water Center is a unit of the University under the supervision and control of the board.

History.

1982, c. 379, § 23-135.7:10; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-2630.
Functions, powers, and duties.

The Water Center shall (i) consult with the General Assembly; federal, state, and local agencies; water user groups; private industry; and other potential users of research; (ii) establish and administer agreements with other public institutions of higher education and private institutions of higher education to conduct research projects; (iii) disseminate new information and facilitate the transfer and application of new technology; (iv) be a liaison between the Commonwealth and the federal research funding agencies and advocate for the Commonwealth’s water research needs; and (v) encourage the development of academic programs in water resources management in conjunction with the Council.

The Water Center shall facilitate and stimulate research that (i) deals with policy issues facing the General Assembly, (ii) supports the state water resource agencies, and (iii) provides water planning and management organizations with tools to increase efficiency and effectiveness of water planning and management.

History.

1982, c. 379, § 23-135.7:9; 1984, c. 734; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-2631.
Executive director.

The principal administrative officer of the Water Center shall be an executive director who shall be appointed by the president of the University, subject to the approval of the board. The executive director shall be under the supervision of the president of the University.

The executive director shall exercise all powers imposed upon him by law, carry out the specific duties imposed upon him by the president of the University, and develop appropriate policies and procedures, with the advice of the Virginia Water Resources Research Center Statewide Advisory Board, for (i) identifying priority research problems; (ii) collaborating with the General Assembly; federal, state, and local governmental agencies; and water user groups in the formulation of its research programs; (iii) selecting projects to be funded; and (iv) disseminating information and transferring technology designed to help resolve water and related land problems of the Commonwealth. The executive director shall employ such personnel and secure such services as may be required to carry out the purposes of this article and expend appropriated funds and accept moneys for cost-sharing on projects funded with federal and private funds.

History.

1982, c. 379, §§ 23-135.7:11, 23-135.7:12; 2016, c. 588; 2017, c. 314.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2017, c. 314, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall be effective retroactively to October 1, 2016.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 314, effective retroactively to October 1, 2016, substituted “The executive director” for “He” in the last sentence of subsection B.

§ 23.1-2632.
Virginia Water Resources Research Center Statewide Advisory Board.

The Virginia Water Resources Research Center Statewide Advisory Board (the Statewide Advisory Board) shall serve in an advisory capacity to the executive director of the Water Center. Representatives of the Statewide Advisory Board shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the General Assembly, and shall include balanced representation from industries; federal, state, and local agencies; water user groups; and concerned citizens. The Statewide Advisory Board shall (i) recommend policy guidelines for implementing the functions of the Water Center, (ii) evaluate the programs of the Water Center, and (iii) advise the executive director of the Water Center and make recommendations to assist him in carrying out the purposes of this article.

History.

1982, c. 379, § 23-135.7:13; 1984, c. 734; 1985, c. 448; 2016, c. 588.